Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2963.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8-15-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 8-15 entitled "Court
Administration" is hereby amended to read as follows:
8-15-12. Rhode Island judicial security act. [Effective January 1, 2026.]
(a) As used in this chapter, the following words shall, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, have the following meanings:
(1) “Data aggregator” means a commercial entity that collects, assembles, or maintains
personal information concerning an individual or an employee of that entity in order to sell the
information or provide third-party access to the information.
(2) “Immediate family” means the spouse, domestic partner, child, step-child, parent, or
any other blood relative who lives in the same residence as a protected individual, as defined herein.
(3) “Personal information” means the Social Security number, residence addresses, home
phone numbers, mobile phone numbers, or personal email addresses of, and identifiable to, the
protected individual or immediate family member.
(4) “Protected individual” means a retired, recalled, or current justice, judge, or magistrate
of the Rhode Island unified judicial system, as defined in § 8-15-1, and retired, recalled, or current
justices, judges, and magistrates of the United States Supreme Court, United States Courts of
Appeal, United States District Courts and United States Bankruptcy Courts who reside in the State
of Rhode Island.

(b)(1) No state agency, county agency, or municipal agency shall publicly post or display
the personal information of any protected individual following receipt of notice provided for in
subsection (b)(2) of this section without first obtaining the written permission of that individual.
(2) Each protected individual may file a written notice of their status as a protected
individual, for themselves and immediate family with any state, county, or municipal agency
requesting each state, county, or municipal agency to mark as confidential the protected
individual’s or immediate family member’s personal information.
(3) Upon receipt of a written request in accordance with this section, the state, county, or
municipal agency shall remove the protected individual’s or immediate family member’s personal
information from publicly available content within seventy-two (72) hours; and further, shall not
publicly post or display the personal information of any protected individual or immediate family
member without first obtaining written permission from the protected individual.
(4) This subsection (b) shall not prohibit the list of delinquent taxpayers published pursuant
to § 44-1-34 from containing the name of any protected individual or immediate family member,
the type of tax levied, and the amount of the delinquency, including interest and penalty. Addresses,
including the city or town and zip code, of any protected individual or immediate family member
shall not be disclosed on such list once the division of taxation receives a written notice filed in
accordance with subsection (b)(2) of this section.
(c)(1) In accordance with this section, it shall be unlawful for a data aggregator to sell,
license, trade, purchase, or otherwise provide or make available for consideration a protected
individual’s or immediate family member’s personal information following receipt of notice
provided for in subsection (b)(2) of this section.
(2) Each protected individual may file a written notice of their status as a protected
individual, for themselves and immediate family, to any person, data aggregator, business, or
association, requesting the person, data aggregator, business, or association mark as confidential
the protected individual’s or immediate family member’s personal information.
(3) In accordance with this section, upon receipt of a written request submitted by the
protected individual, either directly or through an agent, to the person, data aggregator, business,
or association, the person, data aggregator, business, or association shall remove the protected
individual’s or immediate family member’s personal information from publicly available content
within ten (10) business days; and further, shall not in the future publicly post or display the
personal information of any protected individual or immediate family member without first
obtaining written permission from the protected individual.
(4) Within ten (10) business days after receiving a protected individual’s written request, a
LC005647 - Page 2 of 4

person, data aggregator, business, or association shall ensure that the protected individual’s or the
immediate family member’s personal information is not made available on any website or
subsidiary website controlled by the person, data aggregator, business, or association, except for
disclosures to governmental agencies, law enforcement, healthcare organizations, insurance
organizations, financial institutions, or in connection with fraud prevention services or legal
process.
(5) A person, data aggregator, business, or association shall comply with a written request
received from a protected individual’s authorized agent if the request is submitted with a notarized
affidavit signed by the protected individual identifying their agent as being authorized to act on the
protected individual’s behalf in accordance with this section.
(6) After receiving a protected individual’s written request, no person, data aggregator,
business, or association shall transfer the protected individual’s or an immediate family member’s
personally identifiable information to any other person, business, or association through any
medium except as provided herein. This section shall not apply to a transfer made at the request of
the protected individual or that is necessary to effectuate the request to the data aggregator,
business, or association from the protected individual.
(7) A protected individual, or their immediate family member, whose personally
identifiable information is made public as a result of a violation of this section may bring an action
seeking injunctive or declaratory relief in any court of competent jurisdiction within the State of
Rhode Island. If the court grants injunctive or declaratory relief, the person, business, or association
responsible for the violation shall be required to pay the individual’s costs and reasonable attorneys’
fees.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005647
========
LC005647 - Page 3 of 4